Tennessee, session 114, SB2524.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 58, Chapter 2, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
58-2-112.
(a) There is created a voluntary community storm emergency relief program,
hereinafter known as the "program," to be administered by the department of tourist
development in collaboration with the department of agriculture. A hotel, as defined by §
67-4-1401, or a food service establishment, as defined in § 53-8-103, may opt-in to the
program by providing notice to the department of tourist development.
(b) The program must authorize, during a declared state or local emergency due
to a severe weather event:
(1) A hotel to charge a lower, pre-determined emergency rate to local
residents in need of shelter;
(2) A hotel to offer flexible cancellation, early checkout options, and
prorated refunds if circumstances improve, allowing the local resident to return
home earlier than expected; and
(3) Food service establishments, including food trucks, to remain open
and operate in neighborhoods affected by the emergency.
SB2524
012550
- 1 -

(c) Hotel and food service establishment participation in the program is voluntary
and is subject to the business judgment of the operator, room and food availability, as
applicable, and safety considerations.
(d) The department of tourist development, through its marketing division may:
(1) Promote hotels and food establishments participating in the program
through public recognition, promotional support, limited financial assistance
within the resources of the department, or other appropriate means;
(2) Maintain on its website a list of hotels and food service
establishments participating in the program; and
(3) Create an online platform through which a hotel or food service
establishment may choose to participate in the program.
(e) This section does not:
(1) Mandate participation or cooperation by a hotel or food service
establishment operator, a local government, or a department or agency of this
state; or
(2) Create a private right of action, penalty, or enforcement obligation
against this state, a local government, or a hotel or food service establishment
operator.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 53, Chapter 8, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) The commissioner may authorize food service establishments to participate
in the program created under § 58-2-112. As part of a food service establishment's
participation, the commissioner may:
(1) Issue temporary permits or waive restrictions necessary to facilitate
food service establishment participation in the program. Local governments may,
- 2 - 012550

and are encouraged to, issue temporary permits or waive restrictions necessary
to facilitate a food service establishment's participation in the program if the
establishment has been identified as a participant by the commissioner; and
(2) Allow state or local agencies to coordinate with participating food
service establishments to provide meals in areas without power or other utility
services or access to grocery services.
(b) A food service establishment participating in the program is authorized and
encouraged to adopt flexible, community-focused practices during a declared state or
local emergency.
(c) The commissioner may provide informal guidance on flexible, community-
focused practices and publish the guidance on the department's website.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 012550